src/wip/czech.sbl
/*
 * Snowball stemming algorithm for czech language based on grammatical rules.
 * Author: David Hellebrand
 * Brno 2010
 *
 * https://www.fit.vut.cz/research/product/133/.en
 */
routines (
           postlude
           mark_regions  R1
           end_vowel
           end_double
           alternance_i
           exception
           nouns_suffixes       nouns_endings
           adjectives_suffixes  adjectives_endings
           verbs_suffixes        verbs_endings
           adverbs_suffixes
)

externals ( stem )
integers ( p1 )
booleans ( found_suffix )
groupings ( vowel consonant aeiou)
stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in UTF 8) */
stringdef a'   hex '0e1'
stringdef cv   hex '10d'
stringdef dv   hex '10f'
stringdef e'   hex '0e9'
stringdef ev   hex '11b'
stringdef i'   hex '0ed'
stringdef nv   hex '148'
stringdef o'   hex '0f3'
stringdef rv   hex '159'
stringdef sv   hex '161'
stringdef tv   hex '165'
stringdef u'   hex '0fa'
stringdef u^   hex '16f'
stringdef y'   hex '0fd'
stringdef zv   hex '17e'

define vowel 'aeiouy{a'}{e'}{ev}{i'}{o'}{u'}{u^}{y'}'
define consonant 'bc{cv}d{dv}fghjklmn{nv}pqr{rv}s{sv}t{tv}vwxz{zv}'
define aeiou 'aeiou'


define mark_regions as (
    $p1 = limit
    gopast vowel  gopast non-vowel  setmark p1
)

define postlude as repeat (
    [substring] among(
        '{a'}' (<- 'a')
        '{e'}' (<- 'e')
        '{i'}' (<- 'i')
        '{o'}' (<- 'o')
        '{u'}' (<- 'u')
        '{y'}' (<- 'y')
        '{cv}' (<- 'c')
        '{dv}' (<- 'd')
        '{ev}' (<- 'e')
        '{nv}' (<- 'n')
        '{rv}' (<- 'r')
        '{sv}' (<- 's')
        '{tv}' (<- 't')
        '{u^}' (<- 'u')
        '{zv}' (<- 'z')
        ''     (next)
    )
)

define exception as (
    [substring] atlimit among(
        /* special changes: */
        'jsem' 'jsi' 'je' 'jsme' 'jste' 'jsou' 'byl' 'bu{dv}' 'bu{dv}te'
        'bu{dv}me' 'jsa' 'jsouc' 'jsouce' 'budu' 'bude{sv}' 'bude' 'budeme'
        'budete' 'budou'
        (<-'byt')

        'm{a'}m' 'm{a'}{sv}' 'm{a'}' 'm{a'}me' 'm{a'}te' 'maj{i'}' 'm{ev}l'
        'm{ev}j' 'm{ev}jte' 'm{ev}jme' 'maje' 'maj{i'}c' 'maj{i'}ce'
        (<-'mit')

        'jdu' 'jde{sv}' 'jde' 'jdeme' 'jdete' 'jdou' '{sv}el' '{sv}la' '{sv}lo'
        '{sv}li' 'jdi' 'poj{dv}' 'jd{ev}te' 'jd{ev}me' 'poj{dv}te' 'jda' 'jdouc'
        'jdouce' 'p{u^}jdu' 'p{u^}jde{sv}' 'p{u^}jde' 'p{u^}jdeme' 'p{u^}jdete'
        'p{u^}jdou'
        (<-'jit')

        'j{i'}m' 'j{i'}{sv}' 'j{i'}' 'j{i'}me' 'j{i'}te' 'jed{i'}' 'jedl'
        'jeden' 'jez' 'jezte' 'jezme' 'jeda' 'jedouc' 'jedouce'
        (<-'jist')

        'sn{i'}m' 'sn{i'}{sv}' 'sn{i'}' 'sn{i'}me' 'sn{i'}te' 'sn{ev}d{i'}'
        'sn{ev}dl' 'sn{ev}den' 'sn{ev}z' 'sn{ev}zte' 'sn{ev}zme'
        (<-'snist')

        'vid{i'}m' 'vid{i'}{sv}' 'vid{i'}me' 'vid{i'}te' 'vid{i'}' 'vid{ev}l'
        'vid{ev}n' 'viz' 'vizte' 'vizme' 'vida' 'vidouc' 'vidouce'
        (<-'videt')

        'v{i'}m' 'v{i'}{sv}' 'v{i'}' 'v{i'}me' 'v{i'}te' 'v{ev}d{i'}'
        'v{ev}d{ev}l' 'v{ev}d{ev}n' 'v{ev}z' 'v{ev}zte' 'v{ev}zme' 'v{ev}da'
        'v{ev}douc' 'v{ev}douce'
        (<-'vedet')

        'chci' 'chce{sv}' 'chce' 'chceme' 'chcete' 'cht{ev}j{i'}'
        'cht{ev}l' 'cht{ev}n' 'cht{ev}j' 'cht{ev}jte' 'cht{ev}jme' 'cht{ev}'
        'cht{ev}je' 'cht{i'}c' 'cht{ev}j{i'}c' 'cht{i'}ce' 'cht{ev}j{i'}ce'
        (<-'chtit')
    )
) //exception

backwardmode (
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor

    define nouns_suffixes as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among (
                'ice' 'ie' 'ik' 'ika' 'ikum' 'ina' 'inec' 'ing' 'ink' 'inka'
                'iny' 'ion{a'}{rv}' 'isko' 'ismus' 'ista' 'ita' 'itba' 'itel'
                'ium' 'ivo' 'ivum' 'izna' 'i{a'}n' 'i{e'}r' 'i{sv}t{ev}'
                (
                    delete
                    //do alternance_i
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'n{i'}k'
                (
                    delete
                    (['{sv}'] <- 'ch')
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'ace' 'ajzna' 'ala' 'an' 'ance' 'ant' 'an{i'}' 'as' 'at{e'}r'
                'a{rv}' 'ba' 'ce' 'ctv{i'}' 'dlo' 'ec' 'ek' 'ence' 'enice' 'enka'
                'ent' 'en{i'}' 'er' 'erie' 'est' 'et{i'}' 'e{cv}ek' 'e{cv}ka'
                'e{cv}ko' 'graf' 'ka' 'ko' 'kyn{ev}' 'k{a'}{rv}' 'lo' 'log'
                'loun' 'ment' 'met' 'm{ev}r' 'na' 'nce' 'nda' 'nice' 'nka' 'no'
                'nom' 'nost' 'n{a'}' 'n{e'}' 'n{e'}{rv}' 'n{i'}' 'oba' 'obinec'
                'och' 'or' 'ost' 'ot' 'ota' 'oun' 'our' 'out' 'ou{sv}' 'ou{sv}ek'
                'ov' 'ovatel' 'ovec' 'ovina' 'ovisko' 'ovi{sv}t{ev}' 'ovna'
                'ovn{e'}' 'ovn{i'}k' 'ovstvo' 'ov{a'}' 'ov{i'}' 'o{nv}' 'se'
                'slov{i'}' 'stvo' 'stv{i'}' 'tba' 'tec' 'tel' 'telna' 'tina'
                'tka' 'tko' 'tor' 'to{rv}' 'tura' 'tva' 'tvo' 't{e'}ka' 't{i'}'
                'ucha' 'ule' 'unk' 'ura' 'u{nv}k' 'u{sv}ka' 'vka' 'vod' 'xe'
                'yn{ev}' 'ze' '{a'}k' '{a'}l' '{a'}la' '{a'}n' '{a'}nek'
                '{a'}n{i'}' '{a'}rna' '{a'}sek' '{a'}t' '{a'}tko' '{a'}tor'
                '{a'}{cv}' '{a'}{cv}ek' '{a'}{rv}' '{a'}{zv}' '{e'}r' '{rv}ad'
                '{e'}{cv}ko' '{e'}{rv}' '{i'}k' '{i'}n' '{i'}nek' '{i'}rna'
                '{i'}{cv}ek' '{i'}{cv}ka' '{i'}{cv}ko' '{i'}{rv}' '{y'}{rv}'
                '{y'}{sv}' '{cv}an' '{cv}e' '{cv}ka' '{cv}no' '{cv}{i'}'
                '{ev}nka' '{ev}n{i'}' '{ev}t{i'}' '{rv}ad{i'}' '{sv}tina'
                (
                    delete
                    set found_suffix
                )
            )
        )
    ) //nouns_suffixes



    define nouns_endings as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among (
                'eb' 'b{a'}ch' 'b{a'}m' 'b{ev}' 'by' 'bami' 'bou' 'bu' 'bo'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ba'
                )
                'c{u^}' 'cem' 'c{u^}m' '{cv}e'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ec'
                )
                'le' 'el' 'lem' 'l{u^}m' 'lech' 'lu' 'ly' 'la'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'lo'
                )
                'r' 'rami' 'ru' 'r{a'}m' 'ry' 'rou' 'r{a'}ch' 'ro'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ra'
                )
                'nou' 'nami' 'n{a'}ch' 'n{a'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'na'
                )
                'eti' 'ete' 'etem'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'e'
                )
                'nem' 'nech' 'n{u^}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'no'
                )
                'vami' 'vou' 'v{a'}ch' 'v{ev}' 'v{a'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'va'
                )
                'kovi'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ek'
                )
                'ti' 't{ev}m' 't{i'}m' 't{i'}ch' '{tv}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 't{ev}'
                )
                'ga' 'gy' 'gu' 'g{u^}m' 'gov{e'}' 'govi' 'gem' 'g{u^}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'g'
                )
                'v{u^}m' 'vech' 'vem'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'vo'
                )
                'ami' '{a'}ch' 'ou' '{a'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'a'
                )
                'n{ev}mi'
                (
                  delete
                  test aeiou (insert '{nv}')        //jablo-n
                  test 'y' (insert 'n{ev}')         //kolegy-n{ev}
                  test consonant (insert 'e{nv}')   //pis-en,  tres-en
                  set found_suffix
                )
                '{ev}ti' '{ev}mi' '{ev}te' '{ev}tem'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{ev}'
                )
                'kami' 'kou' 'k{a'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ka'
                )
                'at' 'ata' 'atech' 'aty' 'at{u^}m' 'ba' 'ce' 'ci' 'c{i'}ch' 'ec'
                'ech' 'ek' 'em' 'emi' 'en' 'ev' 'e{nv}' 'ka' 'kem' 'ko' 'ku'
                'kum' 'ky' 'k{a'}ch' 'k{u^}' 'k{u^}m' 'lo' 'na' 'ni' 'no' 'nu'
                'ny' 'n{i'}' 'n{i'}ch' 'n{i'}m' 'n{ev}' 'ovi' 'ov{e'}' 'ra'
                't{ev}' 'um' 'va' 'vo' 'vy' 'z{i'}ch' 'zi' '{i'}ch' '{i'}m'
                '{u^}m' 'a' 'e' 'i' 'o' 'u' 'y' '{e'}' '{i'}' '{ev}' '{nv}' '{u^}' 'g' 'k'
                'vu'
                (
                    delete
                )
            )
        )
    ) //nouns_endings

    define adjectives_suffixes as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among (
                'ac{i'}' 'a{cv}n{i'}' 'at{y'}' 'av{y'}' 'biln{i'}' 'ck{y'}'
                'cn{y'}' 'c{i'}' 'en{y'}' 'e{cv}n{i'}' 'e{cv}n{y'}' 'ick{y'}'
                'ic{i'}' 'ijsk{y'}' 'ilink{y'}' 'il{y'}' 'inkat{y'}' 'ist{y'}'
                'ivn{i'}' 'i{cv}el{y'}' 'i{cv}it{y'}' 'i{cv}i{cv}k{y'}'
                'i{cv}n{i'}' 'i{cv}n{y'}' 'kav{y'}' 'lav{y'}' 'liv{y'}' 'l{y'}'
                'ntn{i'}' 'oulink{y'}' 'ounink{y'}' 'ounk{y'}' 'ou{cv}k{y'}'
                'ova' 'ovan{y'}' 'ovic' 'ovit{y'}' 'ovn{i'}' 'ovo' 'ov{y'}'
                'teln{y'}' 'tn{i'}' 'tn{y'}' 'utn{y'}' 'ut{y'}' 'v{y'}'
                '{a'}ln{i'}' '{a'}nsk{y'}' '{a'}rn{i'}' '{cv}{i'}' '{ev}n{y'}'
                '{u^}v' 'n{ev}j{sv}{i'}' 'ov{ev}j{sv}{i'}' 'ov{i'}'
                'ovn{ev}j{sv}{i'}' 'ov{sv}t{ev}j{sv}{i'}' 't{ev}j{sv}{i'}'
                //'{cv}n{y'}' '{cv}iv{y'}'
                '{sv}{i'}'
                (
                    delete
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'in' 'ina' 'ino' 'it{y'}' 'iv{y'}' 'i{cv}k{y'}' 'ink{y'}'
                (
                    delete
                    alternance_i
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'k{y'}' 'sk{y'}' 'ovsk{y'}' '{sv}t{ev}j{sv}{i'}' 'ij{sv}t{ev}j{sv}{i'}'
                (
                    delete
                    (['{zv}'] <- 'h') or (['{sv}'] <- 'ch')
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'n{y'}' 'n{i'}' 'iteln{y'}'
                (
                    delete
                    (['{zv}'] <- 'h') or (['{sv}'] <- 'ch') or (['{cv}'] <- 'k')
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'nat{y'}'
                (
                    delete
                    (['{cv}'] <- 'k')
                    set found_suffix
                )
                'ej{sv}{i'}' '{ev}j{sv}{i'}'
                (
                    delete
                    (['{cv}'] <- 'k') or
                    (['{cv}{tv}'] <- 'ck') or
                    (['{sv}{tv}'] <- 'sk') or
                    (['{zv}'] <- 'h') or
                    (['{sv}'] <- 'ch')
                    set found_suffix
                )
            )
        )
    ) //adjectives_suffixes
